Ohio, session 136, SB305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) As used in this section: 7
(1) "SNAP" means the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 8
Program administered by the Department of Job and Family 9
Services pursuant to section 5101.54 of the Revised Code. 10
(2) "TANF programs" means the Temporary Assistance for 11
Needy Families programs identified in division (A)(4) of section 12
5101.80 of the Revised Code. 13
(3) "WIC" means the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program 14
for Women, Infants, and Children established under Section 17 of 15
the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," 42 U.S.C. 1786. 16
(B) Contingent upon a lapse in federal funding, the 17
Director of Job and Family Services shall certify to the 18

S. B. No. 305 Page 2
As Introduced
Director of Budget and Management the amount necessary to 19
continue to fund the SNAP and TANF programs, and the Director of 20
Health shall certify the amount necessary to continue to fund 21
the WIC program. The amount shall be equivalent to the amount 22
that otherwise would have been received for the respective 23
programs. 24
(C) Subject to division (B) of this section, there is 25
hereby appropriated from the Budget Stabilization Fund the 26
amount necessary, up to the balance in the Budget Stabilization 27
Fund, to continue to fund the SNAP, TANF, and WIC programs. 28
Authorization of this funding expires when the federal 29
government resumes funding operations. 30
Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of 31
Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the 32
source and amount of funds for the appropriations made in this 33
act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation 34
accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from the 35
appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as 36
though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, 37
H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly. 38
(D) The Director of Job and Family Services shall certify 39
to the Director of Budget and Management the amount received in 40
federal reimbursement for the SNAP and TANF programs after the 41
lapse in federal funding has ended, and the Director of Health 42
shall certify the amount received in federal reimbursement for 43
the WIC program after the lapse in federal funding has ended. 44
The Director of Budget and Management shall transfer those 45
certified amounts from the appropriate fund to the Budget 46
Stabilization Fund. 47
Section 2. Section 1 of this act is exempt from the 48

S. B. No. 305 Page 3
As Introduced
referendum under Ohio Constitution, Article II, Section 1d and 49
section 1.471 of the Revised Code and takes effect immediately 50
when this act becomes law. 51